Massachusetts, session 194th, S3021.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 7D of Part I, Title XIV, Chapter 90 is hereby amended by striking out the first
paragraph and replacing it with the following paragraph:-
Section 7D. The requirements of clauses (1), (2), (3), (5), (7), (8), (9), (10), (13) and (16)
of section seven B shall apply to any motor vehicle carrying not more than eight passengers in
addition to the operator, used in the business of transporting school pupils for hire under terms of
contract or otherwise, while so used, but not including any motor vehicle used for not more than
five days in case of emergency. The requirement of clauses (2), (3), (5), (8), (9), (10), (13) and
(16) of section seven B shall apply to any motor vehicle manufactured after the year 2018,
carrying not more than eight passengers in addition to the operator, used in the business of
transporting school pupils for hire under terms of contract or otherwise, while so used, but not
including any motor vehicle used for not more than five days in case of emergency. In addition,
each such vehicle shall be required to be equipped with one pair of adequate chock blocks, a fire
of 2

extinguisher, three flares in compliance with United States Motor Vehicle D.O.T. Safety
Standard No. 125, which shall be placed upon the roadway in conformance with section fourteen
B of chapter eighty-five when such vehicle becomes disabled upon the traveled portion of any
way, and seat belts for each permanent seating accommodation designed and installed in
compliance with applicable United States Motor Vehicle Safety Standards. Each such vehicle
manufactured after 2018, used in the business of transporting school pupils for hire under terms
of contract or otherwise, while so used, shall have a rooftop sign marked "School
Transportation" that is reflective and magnetic, but does not have to be permanently affixed to
the vehicle. No person shall operate a motor vehicle referred to in this section, nor knowingly
allow any passenger to ride in such vehicle unless the operator and all passengers are wearing a
safety belt which is properly adjusted and fastened.
of 2